Hawaii statutes.
§195-6 Natural area reserves system
commission. There shall be a natural area reserves system commission,
hereinafter called the "commission". The commission shall consist of
thirteen members who shall be appointed in the manner and serve for the term set
in section 26-34. Six of the members of the commission shall be persons
possessing scientific qualifications as evidenced by an academic degree in
wildlife or marine biology, botany, forestry, ecology, resource management,
biogeography, zoology, or geology; one member shall be a person possessing
membership in a hiking organization organized in the State; one member shall be
a person possessing membership in a hunting organization organized in the State;
and one member shall be a person possessing a background in native Hawaiian
traditional and customary practices. The chairperson of the board of land and
natural resources, the director of the office of planning, the chairperson of
the board of agriculture and the president of the University of Hawaii, or
their designated representatives, shall serve as ex officio[,] voting members. The
governor shall appoint the chairperson from one of the appointed members of the
commission. The members shall receive no compensation for their services on
the commission but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses
while attending meetings and while in the discharge of their duties.

The commission shall be a part of the
department for administrative purposes as provided in section 26-35.

Any action taken by the commission shall be by
a simple majority of its members. Seven members of the commission shall
constitute a quorum to do business.

The commission may engage employees necessary
to perform its duties, including administrative personnel, as provided by
section 26-35.

The commission shall adopt rules guiding its
conduct and shall maintain a record of its activities and actions. [L 1970, c
139, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 336, §8 and c 350, §4; am L 1993, c 274, §1; am L
1996, c 299, §3; am L 2013, c 4, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next